Utah statutes.
53A-17a-120.   Appropriation for accelerated learning programs.
(1)  Money appropriated to the State Board of Education in Section 53A-17a-104
for accelerated learning programs shall be allocated to local school boards
and charter schools for the following programs:
(a)  programs in grades 1-12 for the gifted and talented;
(b)  advanced placement; and
(c)  International Baccalaureate.
(2) (a)  Districts shall spend monies for these programs according to rules
established by the State Board of Education in accordance with Title 63G,
Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act.
(b)  The State Board of Education shall develop uniform and consistent
policies for school districts to follow in utilizing advanced placement
monies.
